Hawaii statutes.
§323D-18 Information required of providers.
Providers of health care doing business in the State shall submit such
statistical and other reports of information related to health and health care
as the state agency finds necessary to the performance of its functions. The
information deemed necessary includes but is not limited to:

(1) Information regarding changes in the class of
usage of the bed complement of a health care facility under section 323D-54(9);

(2) Implementation of services under section 323D-54;

(3) Projects that are wholly dedicated to meeting the
State's obligations under court orders, including consent decrees, under
section 323D-54(10);

(4) Replacement of existing equipment with an updated
equivalent under section 323D-54(11);

(5) Primary care clinics under the expenditure
thresholds under section 323D-54(12); and

(6) Equipment and services related to that equipment,
that are primarily intended for research purposes as opposed to usual and
customary diagnostic and therapeutic care. [L 1977, c 178, pt of §2; am L 1997,
c 336, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next